Utah statutes.
63B-5-104.   Manner of issuance -- Amounts, interest, and maturity.
(1)  Bonds issued under this chapter may be authorized, sold, and issued at
times and in a manner determined by the commission by resolution.
(2)  Bonds may be issued in one or more series, in amounts, and shall bear
dates, interest rates, including a variable rate, and maturity dates as the
commission determines by resolution.
(3)  A bond issued may not mature later than 20 years after the date of final
passage of this chapter.
